Washington statutes.
RCW 3.50.055

Judicial positions—Filling—Circumstances permitted.

Notwithstanding RCW 3.50.040 and 3.50.050, judicial positions may be filled only by election under the following circumstances:

(1) Each full-time equivalent judicial position shall be filled by election. This requirement applies regardless of how many judges are employed to fill the position. For purposes of this section, a full-time equivalent position is thirty-five or more hours per week of compensated time.

(2) In any city with one or more full-time equivalent judicial positions, an additional judicial position or positions that is or are in combination more than one-half of a full-time equivalent position shall also be filled by election.

[ 1993 c 317 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1993 c 317: See notes following RCW 3.50.810.